Utah statutes.
78B-8-503.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Prevail" means to obtain favorable final judgment, the right to all
appeals having been exhausted, on the merits, on substantially all counts or
charges in the action and with respect to the most significant issue or set of
issues presented, but does not include the settlement of any action, either by
stipulation, consent decree or otherwise, whether or not settlement occurs
before or after any hearing or trial.
(2)  "Reasonable litigation expenses" means court costs, administrative
hearing costs, attorney fees, and witness fees of all necessary witnesses, not
in excess of $25,000 which a court finds were reasonably incurred in opposing
action covered under this part.
(3)  "Small business" means a commercial or business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, which does not have more than 250 employees, but does not
include an entity which is a subsidiary or affiliate of another entity which
is not a small business.
(4)  "State" means any department, board, institution, hospital, college, or
university of the state of Utah or any political subdivision thereof, except
with respect to actions brought under the Utah Antitrust Act, Section
76-10-911, et seq.
